Washington statutes.
RCW 39.80.900

Savings.

Nothing in this chapter shall affect the validity or effect of any contract in existence on January 1, 1982.

[ 1981 c 61 s 7.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1981 c 61: See note following RCW 39.80.010.